Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Chapter 5. Vocational Rehabilitation.

§§ 51.5-15 through 51.5-22.

Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 60.

Cross references.

For current provisions related to vocational rehabilitation, see §

51.5-170

for eligibility; see §

51.5-171

for assessment; see §

51.5-172

for individualized plan for employment; see §

51.5-173

for individual services; see §

51.5-174

for group services; see §

51.5-175

for Community Rehabilitation Program; see §

51.5-176

for participation by clients in cost of services; see §

51.5-177

for client rights regarding services.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, in enactment clauses 59 through 71, eliminated the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services, transferring powers and duties to the newly created Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services. For comparable sections see §

51.5-116

et seq. Where appropriate the historical references and case notes to former provisions have been transferred to the new provisions.